Colorado, session 2026A, HB1373.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-5-104, amend
(1)(b) as follows:
26-5-104. Funding of child welfare services provider contracts
- funding mechanism review - fund - report - rules - definitions.
(1) Reimbursement.
(b) (I) The state department shall reimburse the county departments
ninety percent of the amounts expended by county departments for adoption
and relative guardianship assistance and is authorized to make an
expenditure in excess of appropriations pursuant to section 24-75-109
(1)(b). The adoption and relative guardianship assistance programs are
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

exempt from the close-out process described in subsection (7) of this
section and the capped allocation described in subsection (3) of this section.
NOTWITHSTANDING THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b)(I), THE REIMBURSEMENT RATES
SET FORTH IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(b)(II) AND (1)(b)(III) OF THIS SECTION APPLY
TO NEGOTIATIONS AND CONTRACTS THAT TAKE EFFECT JULY 1, 2026, OR
LATER.
(II) FOR THE ADOPTION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, MONTHLY SUBSIDY
PAYMENTS MUST NOT EXCEED:
(A) FIFTY PERCENT OF FOSTER CARE RATES FOR YOUTH WHO ARE
UNDER NINE YEARS OLD;
(B) FIFTY-FIVE PERCENT OF FOSTER CARE RATES FOR YOUTH WHO
ARE NINE YEARS OLD OR OLDER BUT UNDER FOURTEEN YEARS OLD; AND
(C) SIXTY PERCENT OF FOSTER CARE RATES FOR YOUTH WHO ARE
FOURTEEN YEARS OLD OR OLDER.
(III) FOR THE RELATIVE GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM,
MONTHLY SUBSIDY PAYMENTS MUST NOT EXCEED:
(A) SIXTY PERCENT OF FOSTER CARE RATES FOR YOUTH WHO ARE
UNDER NINE YEARS OLD;
(B) SIXTY-FIVE PERCENT OF FOSTER CARE RATES FOR YOUTH WHO
ARE NINE YEARS OLD OR OLDER BUT UNDER FOURTEEN YEARS OLD; AND
(C) SEVENTY PERCENT OF FOSTER CARE RATES FOR YOUTH WHO ARE
FOURTEEN YEARS OLD OR OLDER.
(IV) (A) EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026, SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
26-7-102 (10), ARE NOT REIMBURSABLE EXCEPT FOR NONRECURRING
ADOPTION EXPENSES DESCRIBED IN SECTION 26-7-106 (2)(c).
(B) CONTRACTS MUST NOT BE RENEGOTIATED SOLELY BECAUSE OF
THE REIMBURSEMENT CHANGE IN SUBSECTION (1)(b)(IV)(A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(C) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE A STANDARDIZED
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1373

NOTICE FOR FAMILIES CURRENTLY RECEIVING SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 26-7-102 (10), THAT DESCRIBES THE REIMBURSEMENT CHANGE IN
SUBSECTION (1)(b)(IV)(A) OF THIS SECTION. THE STANDARDIZED NOTICE
MUST ALLOW A COUNTY TO ADD INFORMATION SPECIFIC TO THEIR
JURISDICTION. EACH COUNTY DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE NOTICE, NO
LATER THAN JUNE 15, 2026, TO ALL FAMILIES CURRENTLY RECEIVING
SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26-7-102 (10).
SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, to implement this
act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of human services for
adoption and relative guardianship assistance is decreased by $2,199,750.
(2) The cash funds appropriation made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
human services for adoption and relative guardianship assistance is
decreased by $407,295. This appropriation is from local funds and is subject
to the "(I)" notation as defined in the annual general appropriation act for
the same fiscal year.
(3) The federal funds anticipated to be received for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year by the department of human services for adoption and relative
guardianship will decrease by $1,339,336. This figure is subject to the "(I)"
notation as defined in the general appropriation act for the same fiscal year.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of human services for adoption and relative guardianship assistance is less
than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section;
or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of human services
for adoption and relative guardianship assistance.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1373

SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1373

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1373